Illinois, session 104th, SB3879.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 55-65 and by adding Section 55-70 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/55-65)7    Sec. 55-65. Prohibited activities. All township and road 8district officers shall be subject to the Public Officer 9Prohibited Activities Act.10(Source: P.A. 88-62.) 11    (60 ILCS 1/55-70 new)12    Sec. 55-70. Township ethics officers and training.13    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), in 14addition to the requirements of Article 70 of the State 15Officials and Employee Ethics Act and Sections 4.1 and 4.5 of 16the Public Officer Prohibited Activities Act, each township 17shall adopt ordinances or resolutions that provide for the 18appointment or designation of an individual, commission, or 19committee to serve as the auditing entity that is responsible 20for receiving, hearing, investigating, adjudicating, and 21disposing of all complaints and allegations of improper 22governmental action or ethical misconduct under State or local   SB3879- 2 -LRB104 18317 RTM 31757 b1laws, rules, ordinances, or policies by any official or 2employee of the township or any official or employee of a road 3district within the township. The auditing entity may not be 4an elected township or road district official. If the auditing 5official is a commission or committee, then no member of the 6commission or committee may be an elected township or road 7district official. If the township does not appoint an 8auditing entity, then the auditing entity shall be the State's 9Attorney of the county in which the unit of local government is 10located. The township's auditing entity shall have 11jurisdiction over any township assessor's or road district's 12offices, including all officials and employees of the township 13assessor's or road district's offices.14    (b) Beginning in 2026, each officer, member, and employee 15of each township and road district must complete, at least 16annually, an ethics training program that equals or exceeds 17the minimum ethics training set forth in the model ethics 18training program developed by the Attorney General. Any 19organization listed in Section 85-15 is authorized to 20administer annual ethics training if the trainings meet the 21requirements provided by the Attorney General. Any person who 22fills a vacancy in an elective or appointed office in a 23township or road district and any person newly employed in a 24position at a township or road district must complete the 25initial ethics training program required under this Section 26within 30 days after commencement of the person's office or   SB3879- 3 -LRB104 18317 RTM 31757 b1employment. Each township and road district shall maintain 2certificates of completion for the ethics training program 3required under this Section, and each officer, member, and 4employee must certify in writing that they completed the 5ethics training program. The certificate developed under this 6Section must be filed with the office of the township clerk on 7or before the deadline to complete the training. Failure to 8complete the ethics training program in a timely manner shall 9be grounds for disciplinary action, which may include a 10financial penalty, to be determined by the auditing entity.11    (c) Instead of enacting an ordinance, resolution, or 12policy under subsection (a), a township or road district, may, 13with the consent of the county board in which the township or 14road district is located, subject itself to the jurisdiction 15of that county's ethics officer or inspector general and all 16ethics laws applicable thereto, including all ethics policies, 17rules, regulations, and ordinances adopted by the county. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.